South Dakota, session 2026, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-25-1.3 be AMENDED:
1-25-1.3. The state shall provide public notice of a meeting, at least seventy-two
hours before the meeting is scheduled to start, not including Saturday, Sunday, or any
legal holiday, by posting a copy of the proposed agenda:
(1) At the principal office of the board, commission, or department holding the
meeting;
(2) That includes the date, time, and location of the meeting;
(3) That is visible, readable, and accessible to the public; and
(4) On a state website, designated by the commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and
Management.
For any special or rescheduled meeting, the information in the notice must be
delivered in person, or by mail, email, or telephone, to members of the local news media
who have requested notice. The state shall also comply with all other requirements of this
section, for a special or rescheduled meeting, as circumstances permit.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.

26.463.10 2 48
An Act to clarify that an official open meeting agenda must be posted online at least seventy-
two hours before the scheduled start of the meeting.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 48
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 48 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB48 ENROLLED